Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.410

Sensitive personal information of vulnerable individuals or in-home caregivers for vulnerable populations—Release of information prohibited.

(1) To protect vulnerable individuals and their children from identity crimes and other forms of victimization, neither the state nor any of its agencies shall release sensitive personal information of vulnerable individuals or sensitive personal information of in-home caregivers for vulnerable populations, as those terms are defined in RCW 42.56.640.

[ 2017 c 4 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 1501, approved November 8, 2016).]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 c 4 ss 8, 10, and 11 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See note following RCW 42.56.640.

Short title—Intent—Construction—2017 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See notes following RCW 9.35.005.